Georgia, session 2025_26, HB38.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Subpart 2A of Part 3 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia
Annotated, relating to the needs based financial aid program, is amended by revising
paragraph (1) of Code Section 20-3-360, relating to definitions, as follows:
"(1) 'Eligible student' means a person:
(A) Whose family income is considered economically disadvantaged, based on criteria
established by the commission, or who has a financial aid gap;
(B) Who meets any academic or other standards established by the commission;
(C) Who is eligible for a scholarship or grant pursuant to Code Section 20-3-519.1;
(D) Who has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA); and
(E) Who has completed:
H. B. 38
- 1 -

LC 61 0053/AP
(i) Seventy 80 percent of the credit requirements toward the credential of his or her
program of study, if such program is a four-year program; or
(ii) Forty-five percent of the credit requirements toward the credential of his or her
program of study, if such program is a two-year program."
SECTION 2.
Said subpart is further amended by revising Code Section 20-3-366, relating to repealer, as
follows:
"20-3-366.
This subpart shall stand repealed by operation of law on June 30, 2025 2029."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 38
- 2 -